California, session 20252026, AB659.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 600 is added to the Business and Professions Code, immediately preceding Section 601, to read:600. A person who has earned a Master of Divinity shall not display the title “MDiv” or “M.D.i.v.” in a communication or advertisement relating to the person’s practice unless the title is clearly distinguishable from the title “MD” or “M.D.” Prohibited displays include, but are not limited to, using different colors, fonts, or font sizes in a way that makes the “MD” or “M.D.” more prominent than the “iv” or “i.v.” A person who violates this section shall not be subject to the criminal penalties set forth in Section 2054.